Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.025

Application of chapter.

(1) This chapter does not apply to any legislative employee who has managerial authority, is a confidential employee, or who does not meet the definition of employee for the purpose of collective bargaining.

(2) This chapter also does not apply to:

(a) Elected or appointed members of the legislature;

(b) Any person appointed to office under statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specific term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or committee;

(c) The deputy secretary of the senate and the deputy chief clerk of the house of representatives;

(d) The senate human resources officer, the human resources director of the house of representatives, and the human resources officers or directors of the legislative support services, legislative service center, and office of the code reviser;

(e) The senate director of accounting and the director of accounting for the house of representatives, and the directors of accounting for the legislative support services, legislative service center, and office of the code reviser;

(f) Caucus chiefs of staff and caucus deputy chiefs of staff;

(g) The speaker's attorney, house counsel, and leadership counsel to the minority caucus of the house of representatives;

(h) The counsels for the senate that provide direct legal advice to the administration of the senate; and

(i) Any employee who provides direct administrative support to the office of the secretary of the senate or chief clerk of the house of representatives, or who conducts accounting, payroll, labor management, collective bargaining, or human resources activities.

[ 2024 c 333 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2024." [ 2024 c 333 s 22.]